Washington statutes.
RCW 35.23.455

Additional powers—Construction and operation of boat harbors, marinas, docks, etc.

The legislative body of any second-class city or town which contains, or abuts upon, any bay, lake, sound, river or other navigable waters, may construct, operate and maintain any boat harbor, marina, dock or other public improvement, for the purposes of commerce, recreation or navigation.

[ 1994 c 81 s 20; 1965 c 154 s 1.]